incubator/apertium-krc/tests/dative.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../krc.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../krc.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] Dative in гъа":
    джыл<n><dat> : джылгъа
    къол<n><dat> : къолгъа
    халкъ<n><dat> : халкъгъа

 "[twol] Dative in ха":
    баш<n><dat> : башха
    кесамат<n><dat> : кесаматха
    арт<n><dat> : артха

 "[twol] Dative in ге":
    ёмюр<n><dat> : ёмюрге
    кесек<n><dat> : кесекге
 
 "[twol] Dative in нга/нге":
    заман<n><dat> : заманнга
    кюн<n><dat> : кюннге
    океан<n><dat> : океаннга
    закон<n><dat> : законнга
    дин<n><dat> : диннге
    айрымкан<n><dat> : айрымканнга
    район<n><dat> : районнга

 "[twol] consonantal у":
    кёзюу<n><dat> : кёзюуге

 "[twol] deleting ь":
    власть<n><dat> : властха
    гавань<n><dat> : гаваннга

 "[twol] Russian loans with final unvoiced":
    секунд<n><dat> : секундха

 "[twol] Russian loans in -ство":
    правительство<n><dat> : правительствогъа
